Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.175

Registration—Inspection and testing—Fees—Report.

(1) Pursuant to RCW 19.94.015, the following annual registration fees shall be charged for each weighing or measuring instrument or device used for commercial purposes in this state:

(a)

Weighing devices:

(i)

Small scales "zero to four hundred pounds capacity" . . . .

$

16.00

(ii)

Intermediate scales "four hundred one pounds to five thousand pounds capacity" . . . .

$

60.00

(iii)

Large scales "over five thousand pounds capacity" . . . .

$

120.00

(iv)

Railroad track scales . . . .

$

1,200.00

(b)

Liquid fuel metering devices:

(i)

Motor fuel meters with flows of twenty gallons or less per minute . . . .

$

16.00

(ii)

Motor fuel meters with flows of more than twenty but not more than one hundred fifty gallons per minute . . . .

$

50.00

(iii)

Motor fuel meters with flows over one hundred fifty gallons per minute . . . .

$

75.00

(c)

Liquid petroleum gas meters:

(i)

With one inch diameter or smaller dispensers . . . .

$

40.00

(ii)

With greater than one inch diameter dispensers . . . .

$

80.00

(d)

Fabric meters . . . .

$

15.00

(e)

Cordage meters . . . .

$

15.00

(f)

Mass flow meters . . . .

$

300.00

(g)

Taxi meters . . . .

$

40.00

(h)

Level 2 electric vehicle supply equipment port . . . .

$

20.00

(i)

Direct current fast charger electric vehicle supply equipment port . . . .

$

40.00

(2) Pursuant to RCW 19.94.015, a reasonable registration fee for electric vehicle supply equipment, in addition to the fees established in subsection (1) of this section, may be established through rule making to cover the remaining costs associated with enforcing this chapter on electric vehicle supply equipment. The department may consider differential fees to reduce the potential burden of the registration fee for electric vehicle service providers operating less than 25 publicly available electric vehicle supply equipment in Washington.

(3) With the exception of subsection (4) of this section, no person shall be required to pay more than the annual registration fee for any weighing or measuring instrument or device in any one year.

(4) The department or a city sealer may establish reasonable inspection and testing fees for each type or class of weighing or measuring instrument or device specially requested to be inspected or tested by the device owner. These inspection and testing fees shall be limited to those amounts necessary for the department or city sealer to cover the direct costs associated with such inspection and testing. The fees shall not be set so as to compete with service agents normally engaged in such services.

(5) The weights and measures advisory group within the department must review the fees in subsection (1) of this section and report to stakeholders on the financial status of the program supported by the fees by September 1, 2024, and September 1st every five years thereafter.

[ 2021 c 238 s 8; 2019 c 96 s 3; 2006 c 358 s 2; (2006 c 358 s 1 expired July 1, 2007); 1995 c 355 s 7; 1992 c 237 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.

Effective dates—2006 c 358: "(1) Sections 1 and 3 through 7 of this act take effect July 1, 2006.

(2) Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2007." [ 2006 c 358 s 8.]

Expiration date—2006 c 358 s 1: "Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2007." [ 2006 c 358 s 9.]

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.